Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 5

Tennessee Agricultural Museum

43-1-501. Created — Objects preserved and displayed.

There is created and established the Tennessee agricultural museum, to be located in suitable quarters at Brentwood Hall, near Nashville, for the purpose of housing and preserving such early-American agricultural tools, implements, home furnishings, and other contrivances, and also, agricultural literature, as may be donated to the museum.

Acts 1959, ch. 294, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 43-2601, 43-5-101.

Cross-References. Animals and animal husbandry, title 44.

Chief executive officers of administrative departments, § 4-3-111.

Department of agriculture, creation, organization and powers of administrative

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

Departments and divisions, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Farmers' extension work, § 5-9-104.

Food, drugs and cosmetics, title 53.

Natural areas preservation, title 11, ch. 14.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund, title 11, ch. 7.

43-1-502. Administration of museum.

The museum shall be under the jurisdiction of and administered by the department of agriculture.

Acts 1959, ch. 294, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-2602; Acts 1980, ch. 737, § 4; T.C.A., § 43-5-102.

Cross-References. Exhibits in possession of state administered by the state museum, § 4-12-105.

43-1-503. Operation of museum — Annual reports.

The department of agriculture shall transact all necessary and proper business connected with the operation of the museum, which shall include drafting a report on the number and kind of exhibits donated during the preceding year, maintaining a register of visitors, and preparing a suitable report covering the activities of the board during the preceding year, which shall be submitted to the governor for approval.

Acts 1959, ch. 294, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-2603; Acts 1980, ch. 737, § 5; T.C.A., § 43-5-103.